Louisiana, session 2026, SB129.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The Section heading of R.S. 47:463.191, (A), and (C) are hereby amended
and reenacted and R.S. 47:463.243 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§463.191. Special prestige license plate; member of congress; designated state
officials
A. Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 47:463(A)(3)(b), the secretary of
the Department of Public Safety and Corrections shall establish a special prestige
license plate for motor vehicles, restricted to passenger cars, pickup trucks,
motorcycles, recreational vehicles, and vans, which may be issued upon application
of any Louisiana member of congress, to members of the Louisiana Supreme
Court, or upon written request of the clerk of court, for official vehicles used by
duly commissioned officers in the course and scope of their official duties.
* * *
C. The secretary shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to
implement the provisions of this Section, including rules and regulations governing
the issuance, transfer, and disposition of the license plates upon the death of the
recipient and governing the design of the plate.
* * *
§463.243. Special prestige license plate; "Master Combat Infantryman"
A.(1) The secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 129 ENROLLED
shall establish a special prestige motor vehicle license plate to be known as the
"Master Combat Infantryman" plate. The license plate shall be restricted to use
on passenger cars, pickup trucks, recreational vehicles, motorcycles, and vans.
(2) The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, shall create the special prestige license plate when the applicable
statutory provisions are met and the department's electronic vehicle and title
registration system is updated to accommodate the creation of new plates.
B. Provided the design is in compliance with R.S. 47:463(A)(3), the
design shall bear a likeness of the United States Army Master Combat
Infantryman Badge as set forth in Department of the Army MILPER 25-093,
centered on the left side of the license plate and the words "Master Combat
Infantryman" centered on the bottom of the plate under the license plate
number. The colors of the plate shall be light blue and gold.
C. The special prestige license plate shall be issued, upon application, to
any person having been awarded the Combat Infantryman Badge and one of the
following expert badges: the Expert Infantryman Badge, the Expert Field
Medical Badge, or the Expert Soldier Badge which shall be sufficient to show
the applicant is authorized to wear the Master Combat Infantryman Badge.
D. The fee for the license plate shall be pursuant to R.S. 47:463 and
490.1.
E.(1) The secretary shall promulgate and adopt rules and regulations as
are necessary to implement the provisions of this Section.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this Paragraph, each military honor
license plate issued pursuant to this Section shall be returned to the secretary
upon the death of the person to whom the plate was issued. A surviving spouse
of a person to whom a license plate was issued pursuant to this Section may
retain a license plate issued pursuant to this Section, provided the surviving
spouse has not remarried and provided the surviving spouse applies to the
secretary for a transfer of the license plate to the surviving spouse. A military
honor license plate transferred pursuant to this Paragraph to a surviving spouse
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 129 ENROLLED
shall be returned to the secretary upon the death or remarriage of the surviving
spouse.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.